modules/nota/src/main/resources/liblouis/da-dk-g26l.ctb
# Liblouis: Danish table for 6 dots grade 2 limited (lille forkortelse)
#
# By Bue Vester-Andersen
#
#  This file is part of liblouis.
#
#  liblouis is free software: you can redistribute it and/or modify it
#  under the terms of the GNU Lesser General Public License as
#  published by the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the
#  License, or (at your option) any later version.
#
#  liblouis is distributed in the hope that it will be useful, but
#  WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#  MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE. See the GNU
#  Lesser General Public License for more details.
#
#  You should have received a copy of the GNU Lesser General Public
#  License along with liblouis. If not, see
#  <http://www.gnu.org/licenses/>.
#
#------------
#
# This file is the Danish main table for 6 dots grade 2.
# If used alone, it will create 6 dots grade 2 with capital letters.
# Use together with da-dk-nocaps.uti to eliminate marking of caps except all caps.
#
# Version: Bue Vester-Andersen, 160602

include http://www.liblouis.org/tables/da-dk-common6.uti


# special rules for q w x and z
noback always q 6-12345
noback always Q 6-12345
#nofor always Q 46-6-q
noback always w 6-2456
noback #always W 6-2456
always x 6-1346
always z 6-1356
always \x00fc 6-1256

endnum nd 6-1345-145
endnum st 6-234-2345
endnum ve 6-1236-15

# Various punctuation
always /\s 6-34-0
always \s/ 0-6-34
always \s-\s 0-36-36-0
always (...) 236-3-3-3-356
always ") 2356-356
always "-" 2356-6-36-2356
always fra! 124-1235-1-235
always !fra 235-124-1235-1
always !! 235-235
always !!! 235-235-235
always ?! 26-6-235
always )! 356-6-235
always (!) 236-6-235-356
always "fra" 2356-124-1235-1-2356
always "!" 2356-6-235-2356
postpunc .! 3-235
postpunc "! 2356-6-235
always '! 4-6-235
always \s! 0-6-235
prepunc ! 6-235
nofor always ! 6-235

nocont \\
nocont @
nocont ://
nocont www
nocont .com
nocont .dk
nocont .eu
nocont .edu
nocont .gov
nocont .mil
nocont .net
nocont .org
nocont .uk
nocont .doc
nocont .exe
nocont .htm
nocont .tex
nocont .txt
nocont .gif
nocont .jpg
nocont .png
nocont .wav
nocont .tar
nocont .zip

#Words
word at 1
word bliver 12
word den 12346
word der 23456
word det 2346
word de 1456
word du 145
word efter 1356
word eller 15
word en 126
word er 156
word et 346
word for 124
word før 246
word gennem 12456
word gør 1245
word han 13456
word har 125
word hun 136
word hvad 2456
word hvor 34
word jeg 245
word kan 13
word lige 123
word med 134
word men 146
word ned 1246
word når 1345
word og 14
word op 135
word over 1346
word på 1234
word ret 12356
word rigtig 1235
word skal 123456
word som 234
word så 16
word te 1256
word til 2345
word under 12345
word ved 1236
word være 345


noback context `["!"] @6-235



noback context $l[]$D @6

noback context $d[]"i" @6
noback context $d$p[]"i" @6

noback context ["-t"]~ @36-6-2345
noback context `["-\s"] @36-36-0

# Pass 2

noback pass2 @6-46-5 @46-5
noback pass2 @6-46 @46-6

# Ensure there is only one letsign
noback pass2 @6-6 @6
